Maine, session 132, LD1395.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17 MRSA §2911, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1977, c. 410, §2, is
amended to read:
A. This section shall does not apply to any noncommercial distribution or exhibition
for purely educational purposes by any library, art gallery, museum, public school,
private school or institution of learning, nor to any commercial distribution or
exhibition by any art gallery or museum.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §14 is enacted to read:
§14. Digital or online library; safety policies and technology protection measures
1. Digital or online library database resource; requirements. A digital or online
library database resource offered by a school administrative unit, public charter school or
postsecondary educational institution to students in kindergarten to grade 12 must prevent
a user from sending, receiving, viewing or downloading materials that are child
pornography or obscene matter or materials that depict sexual exploitation of a minor as
described in Title 17-A, section 282. For the purposes of this section, "obscene matter" has
the same meaning as in Title 17, section 2911, subsection 1, paragraph D.
2. Noncompliance; withholding of payment. Notwithstanding any contract
provision to the contrary, if a digital or online library database resource offered by a school
administrative unit, public charter school or postsecondary educational institution to
students in kindergarten to grade 12 does not meet the requirements described in subsection
1, the school administrative unit, public charter school or postsecondary educational
institution shall withhold payment to the provider of the digital or online library database
resource until the provider demonstrates compliance with the requirements described in
subsection 1.
3. Failure to verify compliance. If a provider of a digital or online library database
resource fails to verify compliance with the requirements of subsection 1 in a timely
manner, a school administrative unit, public charter school or postsecondary educational
institution shall consider the provider's noncompliance a breach of contract.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §4710-D is enacted to read:
§4710-D. Human trafficking prevention instruction and training
1. Human trafficking prevention instruction. A public school or private school may
offer or integrate into its curriculum instructional modules that educate students on the
prevention of sexual abuse, child exploitation and human trafficking. An instruction
module must include, but is not limited to, instruction on recognizing signs of sexual abuse,
sexual exploitation of a minor and human trafficking.
2. Staff training. A public school or private school may offer training to school
employees on the prevention of sexual abuse, child exploitation and human trafficking.
The training must include, but is not limited to, instruction on recognizing signs of sexual
abuse, sexual exploitation of a minor and human trafficking.
Page 1 - 132LR1620(01)